Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 1 Definitions and General Code Provisions

31-1-1.
Short title.

Chapters 1 — 27 of this title may be cited as the “Motor Vehicle Code”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 39, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-1

.

31-1-2.
Applicability of definitions.

Except as otherwise provided, the following definitions of the words and phrases in this chapter apply throughout this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 3.

31-1-3.
Types of vehicles.

“Antique motor car” means any motor vehicle that is more than twenty-five (25) years old. Unless fully inspected and meeting inspection requirements, the vehicle may be maintained solely for use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, and other functions of public interest. The vehicle may also be used for limited enjoyment and purposes other than the previously mentioned activities, but may not be used primarily for the transportation of passengers or goods over any public highway.

After the vehicle has met the requirements of state inspection, a registration plate may be issued to it on payment of the standard fee. The vehicle may be operated on the highways of this and other states, and may, in addition to the registration plate, retain the designation “antique” and display an “antique plate.”

For any vehicle that is more than twenty-five (25) years old, the division of motor vehicles may also issue or approve, subject to rules and regulations that may be promulgated by the administrator, a “year of manufacture plate” for the vehicle that is an exact replica plate designating the exact year of manufacture of the vehicle. The year of manufacture plate, as authorized by this subsection, need only be attached to the rear of the vehicle.

“Antique motorcycle” means any motorcycle that is more than twenty-five (25) years old. Unless fully inspected and meeting inspection requirements, the vehicle shall be maintained solely for use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, and other functions of public interest. The vehicle may also be used for limited enjoyment and purposes other than the previously mentioned activities, but may not be used primarily for the transportation of passengers or goods over any public highway; and

After the vehicle has met the requirements of state inspection, a registration plate may be issued to it, on payment of the standard fee, and the vehicle may be operated on the highways of this and other states, and may, in addition to the registration plate, retain the designation “antique” and display an “antique plate.”

“Authorized emergency vehicle” means vehicles of the fire department (fire patrol); police vehicles; vehicles of the department of corrections while in the performance of official duties; vehicles used by the state bomb squad within the office of state fire marshal; vehicles of municipal departments or public service corporations designated or authorized by the administrator as ambulances and emergency vehicles; and privately owned motor vehicles of volunteer firefighters or privately owned motor vehicles of volunteer ambulance drivers or attendants, as authorized by the department chief or commander and permitted by the Rhode Island Association of Fire Chiefs and Rhode Island Association of Police Chiefs Joint Committee for Volunteer Warning Light Permits.

“Automobile” means, for registration purposes, every motor vehicle carrying passengers other than for hire.

“Bicycle” means every vehicle having two (2) tandem wheels, except scooters and similar devices, propelled exclusively by human power, and upon which a person may ride.

“Camping recreational vehicle” means a vehicular type camping unit, certified by the manufacturer as complying with ANSI A119.2 Standards, designed primarily as temporary living quarters for recreation that has either its own motor power or is mounted on, or towed by, another vehicle. The basic units are tent trailers, fifth-wheel trailers, motorized campers, travel trailers, and pick-up campers.

“Electric motorized bicycle” means a motorized bicycle that may be propelled by human power or electric motor power, or by both, with an electric motor rated not more than two (2) (S.A.E.) horsepower, that is capable of a maximum speed of not more than twenty-five (25) miles per hour.

“Electric personal assistive mobility device” (“EPAMD”) is a self-balancing, non-tandem two-wheeled (2) device, designed to transport only one person, with an electric propulsion system that limits the maximum speed of the device to fifteen (15) miles per hour.

“Fifth-wheel trailer”: A towable recreational vehicle, not exceeding four hundred (400) square feet in area, designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle that contains a towing mechanism that is mounted above or forward of the tow vehicle’s rear axle and that is eligible to be registered for highway use.

“Hearse” means every motor vehicle used for transporting human corpses. A hearse shall be considered an automobile for registration purposes.

“Jitney or bus” means: (1) A “public bus” that includes every motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer, tractor trailer, or tractor trailer combination, used for the transportation of passengers for hire, and operated wholly or in part upon any street or highway as a means of transportation similar to that afforded by a street railway company, by indiscriminately receiving or discharging passengers, or running on a regular route or over any portion of one, or between fixed termini; or (2) A “private bus” that includes every motor vehicle other than a public bus or passenger van designed for carrying more than ten (10) passengers and used for the transportation of persons, and every motor vehicle other than a taxicab designed and used for the transportation of persons for compensation.

“Motorcycle” means only those motor vehicles having not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground and a saddle on which the driver sits astride, except bicycles with helper motors as defined in subsection (n) of this section.

“Motor-driven cycle” means every motorcycle, including every motor scooter, with a motor of no greater than five (5) horsepower, except bicycles with helper motors as defined in subsection (n) of this section.

“Motorized bicycles” means two-wheel (2) vehicles that may be propelled by human power or helper power, or by both, with a motor rated not more than four and nine-tenths (4.9) horsepower and not greater than fifty (50) cubic centimeters, that are capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour.

“Motorized camper”: A camping recreational vehicle, built on, or permanently attached to, a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis cab or van that is an integral part of the completed vehicle.

“Motorized tricycles” means tricycles that may be propelled by human power or helper motor, or by both, with a motor rated no more than 1.5 brake horsepower that is capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour.

“Motorized wheelchair” means any self-propelled vehicle, designed for, and used by, a person with a disability that is incapable of speed in excess of eight (8) miles per hour.

“Motor scooter” means a motor-driven cycle with a motor rated not more than four and nine-tenths (4.9) horsepower and not greater than fifty (50) cubic centimeters that is capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour.

“Motor vehicle” means every vehicle that is self-propelled or propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails, except vehicles moved exclusively by human power, an EPAMD and electric motorized bicycles as defined in subsection (g) of this section, and motorized wheelchairs.

“Motor vehicle for hire” means every motor vehicle other than jitneys, public buses, hearses, and motor vehicles used chiefly in connection with the conduct of funerals, to transport persons for compensation in any form, or motor vehicles rented for transporting persons either with or without furnishing an operator.

“Natural gas vehicle” means a vehicle operated by an engine fueled primarily by natural gas.

“Park trailer”: A camping recreational vehicle that is eligible to be registered for highway use and meets the following criteria: (1) Built on a single chassis mounted on wheels; and (2) Certified by the manufacturer as complying with ANSI A119.5.

“Passenger van” means every motor vehicle capable of carrying ten (10) to fourteen (14) passengers plus an operator and used for personal use or on a not-for-hire basis. Passenger vans may be used for vanpools, transporting passengers to and from work locations, provided that the operator receives no remuneration other than free use of the vehicle.

“Pedal carriage” (also known as “quadricycles”) means a nonmotorized bicycle with four (4) or more wheels operated by one or more persons for the purpose of, or capable of, transporting additional passengers in seats or on a platform made a part of or otherwise attached to the pedal carriage. The term shall not include a bicycle with trainer or beginner wheels affixed to it, nor shall it include a wheelchair or other vehicle with the purpose of operation by or for the transportation of a person with a disability, nor shall it include a tricycle built for a child or an adult with a seat for only one operator and no passenger.

“Pick-up camper”: A camping recreational vehicle consisting of a roof, floor, and sides designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the back of a pick-up truck.

“Rickshaw” (also known as “pedi cab”) means a nonmotorized bicycle with three (3) wheels operated by one person for the purpose of, or capable of, transporting additional passengers in seats or on a platform made a part of, or otherwise attached to, the rickshaw. This definition shall not include a bicycle built for two (2) where the operators are seated one behind the other, nor shall it include the operation of a bicycle with trainer or beginner wheels affixed thereto, nor shall it include a wheelchair or other vehicle with the purpose of operation by or for the transportation of a person with a disability.

“School bus” means every motor vehicle owned by a public or governmental agency, when operated for the transportation of children to or from school; or privately owned, when operated for compensation for the transportation of children to or from school.

“Suburban vehicle” means every motor vehicle with a convertible or interchangeable body or with removable seats, usable for both passenger and delivery purposes, and including motor vehicles commonly known as station or depot wagons or any vehicle into which access can be gained through the rear by means of a hatch or trunk and where the rear seats can be folded down to permit the carrying of articles as well as passengers.

“Tent trailer”: A towable recreational vehicle that is mounted on wheels and constructed with collapsible partial side walls that fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold for use and that is eligible to be registered for highway use.

“Trackless trolley coach” means every motor vehicle that is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated on rails.

“Travel trailer”: A towable recreational vehicle, not exceeding three hundred twenty square feet (320 sq. ft.) in area, designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle containing a towing mechanism that is mounted behind the tow vehicle’s bumper and that is eligible to be registered for highway use.

“Vehicle” means every device in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway, except devices used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 2; P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 3; P.L. 1953 (1st S.S.), ch. 3236, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3378, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-3

; P.L. 1964, ch. 214, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 58, § 3; P.L. 1976, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 64, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 377, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 476, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 654, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 208, § 4; P.L. 1997, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 68; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 68; P.L. 1999, ch. 447, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 56, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 25; P.L. 2014, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 389, § 1; P.L 2014, ch. 454, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 547, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 301, § 1.

31-1-3.1.
Autocycles.

“Autocycle” means only those motor vehicles that:

Do not have more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground;

Are designed to be controlled with a steering wheel and foot pedals for acceleration, braking, or shifting;

Are equipped with seating that does not require occupants to straddle or sit astride the seating; and

Are manufactured and certified to comply with federal safety requirements for a motorcycle.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, an “autocycle” shall be considered to be a “motorcycle” as defined in §

31-1-3(l)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 404, § 1.

31-1-4.
Trucks and tractors.

“Covered heavy-duty tow and recovery vehicle” means a vehicle that is transporting a disabled vehicle from the place where the vehicle became disabled to the nearest appropriate repair facility; and, provided the vehicle has a gross vehicle weight that is equal to or exceeds the gross vehicle weight of the disabled vehicle being transported.

“Farm tractor” means every motor vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm implement, for drawing plows, mowing machines, and other implements of husbandry or farm vehicles.

“Tow cars and tow trucks” means every motor vehicle ordinarily used for the purpose of towing or removing motor vehicles or assisting disabled motor vehicles.

“Trailer transporter towing unit” means a power unit that is not used to carry property when operating in a towaway trailer transporter combination.

“Towaway trailer transporter combination” means a combination of vehicles consisting of a trailer transporter towing unit and two (2) trailers or semitrailers:

With a total weight that does not exceed twenty-six thousand pounds (26,000 lbs.); and

In which the trailers or semitrailers carry no property and constitute inventory property of a manufacturer, distributor, or dealer of the trailers or semitrailers.

“Truck” means every motor vehicle designed, used, or maintained primarily for the transportation of property. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall determine, in case of doubt, if a motor vehicle is subject to registration as a truck.

“Truck tractor” means a non-cargo-carrying power unit that operates in combination with a semi-trailer or trailer, except that a truck tractor and a semi-trailer or trailer engaged in the transportation of automobiles may transport motor vehicles on part of the power unit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-4

; P.L. 1983, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 9; P.L. 2018, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 45, § 1.

31-1-5.
Trailers.

“Automobile transporter” means any vehicle combination designed and used for the transport of assembled highway vehicles, including truck camper units. An automobile transporter shall not be prohibited from the transport of cargo or general freight on a backhaul, provided it complies with weight limitations for a truck tractor and semitrailer combination.

“Pole trailer” means every vehicle without motive power designed to be drawn by another vehicle and attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach, or pole, or by being boomed or secured to the towing vehicle, and ordinarily used for transporting long or irregularly shaped loads such as poles, pipes, or structural members capable, generally, of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting connections.

“Semi-trailer” means every vehicle with or without motive power, other than a pole trailer, designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle, constructed so that some of its weight and that of its load rests upon or is carried by another vehicle.

“Tractor-semi-trailer combination” means every combination of a tractor and a semi-trailer properly attached to the tractor to form an articulated vehicle.

“Tractor-trailer combination” means every combination of a tractor and a trailer, properly attached to the tractor to form an articulated vehicle.

“Trailer” means every vehicle without motive power, other than a pole trailer, designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle, constructed so that none of its weight rests upon the towing vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-5

; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 25; P.L. 2018, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 45, § 1.

31-1-6.
Specially constructed and reconstructed vehicles.

“Essential parts” means all integral and body parts of a vehicle of a type that must be registered under chapters 3 — 9 of this title, the removal, alteration, or substitution of which would tend to conceal the identity of the vehicle or substantially alter its appearance, model, type, or mode of operation.

“Reconstructed vehicle” means every vehicle of a type that must be registered under chapters 3 — 9 of this title, which has been materially altered from its original construction by the removal, addition, or substitution of essential parts, new or used.

“Specially constructed vehicle” means every vehicle of a type that must be registered under chapters 3 — 9 of this title, but not originally constructed under a distinctive name, make, model, or type by a generally recognized manufacturer of vehicles; provided, that specially constructed vehicles shall include hand-built, home-built, and one-off cars that do not resemble any production car. Specially constructed vehicles shall be entitled to standard passenger automobile plates; provided, that all safety and emissions standards applied to reconstructed vehicles are met.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 5; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-6

; P.L. 2013, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 203, § 1.

31-1-7.
Foreign vehicle.

“Foreign vehicle” means every vehicle, of a type that must be registered under chapters 3 — 9 of this title, brought into this state from another state, territory or country, other than in the ordinary course of business by or through a manufacturer or dealer, and not registered in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-7

.

31-1-8.
Farm vehicle.

“Farm vehicle” means every vehicle which is designed for and used for agricultural purposes and used by the owner of the vehicle or family member(s) or employee(s) or designees of the owner, in the conduct of the owner’s agricultural operations, which use shall include the delivery of agricultural products produced by the farmer but shall not include commercial hire for nonagricultural uses, including, but not limited to, hauling of sand and gravel, snow plowing, land clearing for other than agricultural purposes or directly on the vehicle owner’s farm, and landscaping. For an owner to qualify as having agricultural purposes, the owner shall provide evidence that he or she meets the requirements of §

44-18-30

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-8

; P.L. 2002, ch. 404, § 1.

31-1-9.
Mobile equipment.

“Mobile equipment” means every vehicle not designed or used primarily for the transportation of persons or property and only incidentally operated or moved over a highway, including but not limited to: ditch digging apparatus, well boring apparatus, and road construction or maintenance machinery such as asphalt spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, tractors other than truck tractors, ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, road rollers, scarifiers, earth moving carry-alls and scrapers, power shovels and drag lines, and self-propelled cranes and earth moving equipment. The term does not include house trailers, dump trucks, truck mounted transit mixers, cranes, or shovels, or other vehicles designed for the transportation of persons or property to which machinery has been attached.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-9

; P.L. 1959, ch. 123, § 1.

31-1-10.
Types of tires.

“Metal tire” means every tire having a surface made wholly or partly of metal, or other hard, non-resilient material, in contact with the highway.

“Pneumatic tire” means every tire in which compressed air is designed to support the load.

“Solid rubber tire” means every solid tire constructed of rubber or other nonmetallic substances, except pneumatic tires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-10

.

31-1-11.
Railroads and trains.

“Railroad” means a carrier of persons or property upon cars, other than streetcars, operated upon stationary rails.

“Railroad train” means an engine driven by steam, electric, or other means, excluding streetcars, with or without cars coupled to it, operated upon stationary rails.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-11

.

31-1-12.
Explosives and flammable liquids.

“Explosive” means any chemical compound or chemical mixture that is commonly used or intended for the purpose of producing an explosion and which contains any oxidizing and combustive units or other ingredients in such proportions, quantities, or packing that an ignition by fire, friction, concussion, percussion, or detonation of any part of the compound or mixture may cause a sudden generation of highly heated gases with resultant gaseous pressures capable of producing destructive effects on contiguous objects or of destroying life or limb.

“Flammable liquid” means any liquid which has a flash point of seventy degrees Fahrenheit (70 degrees F.), or less, as determined by a tagliabue or equivalent closed cup test device.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-12

.

31-1-13.
Gross weight.

“Gross weight” means the weight of a vehicle without load plus the maximum weight of any load allowed to be carried on the vehicle. Maximum weight shall be determined by the manufacturer’s allowed gross weight, or as determined by the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-13

; P.L. 1969, ch. 173, § 1.

31-1-14.
Renewal.

“Renewal” means the reissuance of a registration, license, or instruction permit, issued under the provisions of chapters 1 — 27 of this title, the term of which has expired.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 13; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-14

.

31-1-15.
Suspension, revocation, and cancellation.

“Cancellation” means the registration, driver’s license, or instruction permit is annulled and terminated because of some error or defect or because the former bearer is no longer entitled to one, but the cancellation is without prejudice and a new application may be made at any time after the cancellation.

“Revocation” means the registration, driver’s license, instruction permit and privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways is terminated and shall not be renewed or restored, except that an application for a new registration, license, or the privilege to drive may be presented and acted upon in accordance with the provisions of chapters 1 — 27 of this title.

“Suspension” means the registration, license, or instruction permit and privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways is withdrawn for a specified period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 14; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 3; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-15

.

31-1-16.
Administrator and division.

“Administrator” means the administrator of the division of motor vehicles of this state.

“Division” means the division of motor vehicles within the department of revenue of this state acting directly or through its authorized officers and agents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-16

; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 2.

31-1-17.
Types of persons.

“Bailee” means a bailee is one to whom possession of personal property has been entrusted by the bailor for a specific purpose resulting from either an express or implied contract, with the understanding that this personal property shall be returned to the bailor or any person designated by the bailor when the terms and purposes of the contract have been accomplished.

“Chauffeur” means any person who drives a jitney, bus, school bus, motor vehicle used principally for hire with operator, or trackless trolley coach, regardless of the vehicle’s capacity, and any person who drives a truck, tractor, or tractor semi-trailer, if the gross vehicle weight is twenty-six thousand and one pounds (26,001 lbs.) or more. Proper officers and drivers of fire apparatus when in the performance of their duties are not deemed to be chauffeurs.

“Driver” means any operator or chauffeur who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle.

“Operator” means every person, other than a chauffeur, who drives or is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle upon a highway or who is exercising control over or steering a vehicle being towed by a motor vehicle.

“Owner” means a person who holds the legal title to a vehicle. In the event a vehicle is the subject of an agreement for conditional sale or lease with right of purchase upon performance of stated conditions and immediate right of possession vested in the vendee or lessee, or in the event a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then the conditional vendee, lessee, or mortgagor is deemed the owner for the purposes of chapters 1 — 27 of this title.

“Pedestrian” means any person afoot.

“Person” means every individual, firm, partnership, corporation, or association.

“Skateboarder, rollerskater, inline skater, or scooter rider” means any person who utilizes a human-powered device containing any number of wheels, whether in tandem or inline, which enables the person to propel himself or herself in a given direction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 16; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-17

; P.L. 1984, ch. 295, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 202, § 1.

31-1-18.
Resident and nonresident.

“Nonresident” means any person who is not a resident of this state or is temporarily residing in this state as a student or as a member of the armed forces of the United States.

“Resident” means a person:

Who owns, rents, or leases real estate within the state as his or her residence and:

Engages in a trade, business, or profession in this state; or

Enrolls his or her children in a school in this state for a period exceeding ninety (90) days; or

Who is registered to vote or is eligible to register to vote under the laws of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-18

; P.L. 1966, ch. 104, § 1.

31-1-19.
Types of business.

“Applicant” means any person, firm, corporation, or association making application under chapters 1 — 27 of this title.

“Dealer” means every person engaged in the business of buying, selling, or exchanging vehicles required to be registered under chapters 3 — 9 of this title, and who has an established place of business for that purpose in this state.

“Distributor” means every person, resident, or nonresident of this state, who sells or distributes motor vehicles to motor vehicle dealers in this state, or who maintains a distributor representative in this state.

“Factory branch” means every branch office maintained by a manufacturer for the sale of motor vehicles to distributors, or for the sale of motor vehicles to motor vehicle dealers or for directing or supervising, in whole or in part, its representatives in this state.

“Factory representative” means every representative employed by a manufacturer or by a factory branch for the purpose of making or promoting the sale of its motor vehicles, or for supervising or contacting its dealers or prospective dealers.

“Licensee” means any person receiving a license under chapters 1 — 27 of this title.

“Licensor” means either the administrator, an authorized representative, or both, who are authorized to issue a license under chapters 1 — 27 of this title.

“Manufacturer” means every person engaged in the business of constructing or assembling vehicles required to be registered under chapters 3 — 9 of this title at an established place of business in this state.

“New and unused motor vehicle dealer” means every person, firm, or corporation which sells, solicits, or advertises the sale of new and unused motor vehicles; holds a bona fide contract or franchise in effect with a manufacturer or distributor of the vehicle(s) to be dealt in; maintains adequate space in the building or structure where the established business is conducted for the display of those vehicle(s); provides for vehicle repair and servicing; and stores parts and accessories for those motor vehicles.

“Transporter” means every person engaged in the business of delivering vehicles required to be registered under chapter 3 of this title from a manufacturing, assembling, and distributing plant to a point of destination or for the purpose of weighing, testing, transporting, or delivering that vehicle, or for the purpose of moving that vehicle in connection with making installations on or improvements to it, or for repossession of or foreclosure of it.

“Wrecker” means every person engaged in the business of wrecking or dismantling motor vehicles for the resale of the parts or material from them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-19

; P.L. 1960, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 189, § 1.

31-1-20.
Established place of business.

“Established place of business” means the place actually occupied either continuously or at regular periods by a dealer or manufacturer where the books and records of that business are kept and where a large share of that business is transacted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-20

.

31-1-21.
Enforcement officers.

“Police officer” means every officer authorized to direct or regulate traffic or to make arrests for violations of traffic regulations or the administrator of the division of motor vehicles and up to five (5) subordinates designated by the administrator under the provisions of §

31-2-3

.

“Proper officer” means for the purposes of chapters 1 — 50 of this title, any member of the state or municipal police, deputy sheriff, city or town sergeant, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, or any subordinate appointed by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles under the provisions of §

31-2-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-21

; P.L. 1975, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 60.

31-1-22.
Local authorities.

“Local authorities” means every city, town, or other local board or body having authority to enact laws relating to traffic under the constitution and laws of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-22

.

31-1-23.
Types of roads.

“Bicycle lane” means a portion of highway right-of-way designated by the state and identified by official traffic control devices (pavement markings) for the exclusive use of bicyclists. The operation and parking of motor vehicles is prohibited within the lane identified for exclusive use by bicyclists, except when making a turn, entering or leaving the roadway or a parking lane, or when required in the course of official duty.

“Bicycle route” means a shared right-of-way along a highway, designated by the state and identified by official traffic control devices (signs) for use by bicyclists.

“Bicycle trail or path” means a bikeway physically separated from motorized vehicular traffic by an open space or barrier and either within the highway right-of-way or within an independent right-of-way. Bicycle trails or paths may also be used by pedestrians, skaters, wheelchair users, joggers and other nonmotorized users.

“Laned roadway” means a roadway which is divided into two (2) or more clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic.

“Limited access highway” means every highway, street, or roadway to or from which owners or occupants of abutting lands and other persons have no legal right of access except at those points and in that manner determined by the public authority having jurisdiction over it.

“Local highway” means every street or highway other than a state highway, private road, or driveway.

“Private road or driveway” means every way or place in private ownership that is used for vehicular travel only by the owner and by those others having express or implied permission from the owner.

“Roadway” means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel, excluding the sidewalk, berm, or shoulder even when used by persons riding bicycles. In the event a highway includes two (2) or more separate roadways, “roadway” refers to the roadway separately and not the roadways collectively.

“Sidewalk” means that portion of a street between the curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property lines intended for the use of pedestrians.

“State highway” means every street or highway constructed and/or maintained by the director of public works and the division of roads and bridges.

“Street or highway” means the entire width between boundary lines of every way when any part of it is open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicular traffic.

“Through highway” means every highway or portion of a highway having entrances from intersecting highways at which vehicular traffic is required by law to stop before entering or crossing, and where stop signs are erected under the provisions of chapters 1 — 27 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 22; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, §§ 5, 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-23

; P.L. 1976, ch. 58, § 3; P.L. 1982, ch. 302, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 640, § 3.

31-1-24.
Intersection.

“Intersection” means the area embraced within the prelongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two (2) highways which join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at any other angle may come in conflict.

Where a highway includes two (2) roadways thirty feet (30´) or more apart, then every crossing of each roadway of that divided highway by an intersecting highway is to be regarded as a separate intersection. When the intersecting highway also includes two (2) roadways thirty feet (30´) or more apart, then every crossing of the two (2) roadways of that highway is to be regarded as a separate intersection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-24

.

31-1-25.
Crosswalk.

“Crosswalk” means:

That part of a roadway at an intersection included within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from the curbs, or in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the traversable roadway; or

Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-25

.

31-1-26.
Safety zone.

“Safety zone” means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians, and which is protected or is marked or indicated by adequate signs to be plainly visible at all times while set apart as a safety zone.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-26

.

31-1-27.
Business and residence districts.

“Business district” means the territory contiguous to and including a highway when within any six hundred feet (600´) along that highway there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes, including but not limited to hotels, banks or office buildings, railroad stations, and public buildings which occupy at least three hundred feet (300´) of frontage on one side or three hundred feet (300´) collectively on both sides of the highway.

“Residence district” means the territory, contiguous to and including a highway but not comprising a business district, when for a distance of three hundred feet (300´) or more the property is in the main improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-27

.

31-1-28.
Types of traffic control devices.

“Official traffic control devices” means all signs, signals, markings, and devices not inconsistent with chapters 1 — 27 of this title placed or erected by authority of a public body or official having jurisdiction, for the purpose of regulating, warning, or guiding traffic.

“Railroad sign or signal” means any sign, signal, or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a railroad train.

“Traffic control signs” means any device, whether manually, electrically, or mechanically operated, by which traffic is alternately directed to stop and to proceed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-28

.

31-1-29.
Traffic.

“Traffic” means pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, and other conveyances either singly or together while using any highway for purposes of travel.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-29

.

31-1-30.
Right-of-way.

“Right-of-way” means the privilege of the immediate use of the highway.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-30

.

31-1-31.
Types of stops.

“Park” means, when prohibited, the standing of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, otherwise than temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading.

“Stop” means, when required, a complete cessation from movement.

“Stop, stopping or standing” means, when prohibited, any stopping or standing of a vehicle whether occupied or not, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or traffic control sign or signal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 1, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-31

.

31-1-32.
Severability.

If any part or parts of this title are held to be unconstitutional that unconstitutionality shall not affect the validity of the remaining parts of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2295, art. 39, § 2; P.L. 1952, ch. 3002, § 44; G.L. 1956, §

31-1-32

; P.L. 1962, ch. 204, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 324, § 9.